Utah statutes.
78B-4-304.   Pleading requirements.
(1)  In any action commenced under the provisions of Subsection 78B-4-303(2),
the complaint or petition shall state with particularity the following:
(a)  the statute, rule, regulation, ordinance, or other law that was allegedly
violated;
(b)  the facts that are alleged to constitute a material violation of the
statute, rule, regulation, ordinance, or other law; and
(c)  the facts alleged to demonstrate that the violation proximately caused
actual injury to the plaintiff.
(2)  The complaint or petition shall also state with particularity facts
sufficient to support a reasonable inference that the violation was with
intent to deceive or injure consumers or with the actual knowledge that the
violation was injurious to consumers.
